Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-308
Cattle drover; mixing of cattle; duty to separate; penalty.

When the stock of any resident of the State of Nebraska shall mix with any drove of any animals, it shall be the duty of the drover or drovers, or person in charge of such drove, to cut out and separate such stock from such droves immediately. Every person, either owner or drover, or otherwise connected with such drove, who shall neglect to comply with the provisions of this section, shall be fined in any sum not exceeding one thousand dollars.

Laws 1879, § 7, p. 69;

R.S.1913, § 102;

C.S.1922, § 110;

C.S.1929, § 54-307;

R.S.1943, § 54-308.